New Jersey, session 221, A253.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: Company means any sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, or other entity or business association, including any wholly owned subsidiary, majority owned subsidiary, parent company, or affiliate of such entity or business association, that exists for the purpose of making profit. Government of China means the government of the Peoples Republic of China led by the Chinese Communist Party. "State agency" means the legislative or executive branch of the State, including, but not limited to, any department, board, bureau, commission, division, office, council, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or independent agency, public authority or public benefit corporation. b.  A company owned by, operated by, or affiliated with the government of China shall be ineligible to, and shall not, bid on or submit a proposal, directly or indirectly through a third party, for a contract to provide technology goods or services with any State agency. c.  A State agency shall require a company that submits a bid or proposal with respect to a contract for technology goods or services to certify that the company is eligible to bid or submit the proposal. d.  If the Division of Purchase and Property in the Department of the Treasury determines that a company has submitted a false certification under subsection c. of this section: (1)  the company shall be liable for a civil penalty in an amount that is equal to the greater of $250,000 or twice the amount of the contract for which a bid or proposal was submitted; and (2)  the State agency or the Division of Purchase and Property shall terminate the contract with the company; and 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.